Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,139
District funds; authorized depositories.

Any irrigation district treasurer may deposit the money received or held by him or her by virtue of his or her office in some state or national bank in the State of Nebraska, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1935, c. 18, § 1, p. 93;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 46-1,104;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,139;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 27;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 31.